Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1138.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "will" in section 102 of Title 20 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:123456789101112131415161718192021 * * *"Will." Means a written will, codicil or other testamentary writing[.], including an electronic will as provided in Chapter 26 (relating to electronic wills)."Writing." Includes a record readable as text under Chapters 26 and 40 (relating to uniform electronic estate planning documents).Section 2. Sections 2504.1 and 2505 of Title 20 are amended to read:§ 2504.1. Validity of execution.A will is validly executed if executed in compliance with section 2502 (relating to form and execution of a will) or 2605 (relating to execution of electronic will), or in compliance with the law of the jurisdiction where the testator was domiciled at the time of the execution of the will or at the time of his death.§ 2505. Revocation of a will.[No] Except as otherwise provided in section 2606 (relating to electronic revocation), no will or codicil in writing, or any part thereof, can be revoked or altered otherwise than:(1) Will or codicil.--By some other will or codicil in writing;(2) Other writing.--By some other writing declaring the same, executed and proved in the manner required of wills[;], provided that any revocation by electronic means under this paragraph shall comply with the execution requirements of an electronic will under section 2605(a) (relating to execution of electronic will); or(3) Act to the document.--By being burnt, torn, canceled, obliterated, or destroyed, with the intent and for 20260SB1138PN1375 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the purpose of revocation, by the testator himself or by another person in his presence, as defined in section 2602 (relating to definitions), and by his express direction. If such act is done by any person other than the testator, the direction of the testator must be proved by the oaths or affirmations of two competent witnesses.Section 3. Title 20 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 26ELECTRONIC WILLSSec.2601. Short title of chapter.2602. Definitions.2603. Law applicable to electronic will; principles of equity.2604. Choice of law regarding execution.2605. Execution of electronic will.2606. Electronic revocation.2607. Electronic will attested and made self-proving at time of execution.2608. Certification of paper copy.2609. Transitional provision.§ 2601. Short title of chapter.This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Electronic Wills Act.§ 2602. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Electronic." Relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities.20260SB1138PN1375 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Electronic will." A will executed by electronic means, in whole or in part, in compliance with section 2605(a) (relating to execution of electronic will)."Information." The term includes data, text, images, codes, computer programs, software and databases."Observe" or "observing." To perceive another's actions or expressions of intent through the senses of eyesight and hearing. The term includes perceptions involving the use of technology or learned skills to:(1) assist the person's capabilities of eyesight or hearing, or both; or(2) compensate for an impairment of the person's capabilities of eyesight or hearing, or both."Presence" or "in the presence of." The term means:(1) the parties:(i) are directly located in the same physical space ("physical presence"); or(ii) are able to interact with each other in real time through the use of audiovisual technology now known or later developed ("electronic presence");(2) the witnesses are able to positively identify the testator; and(3) each witness is able to interact with the testator and with each other by observing:(i) the testator's expression of intent to execute the electronic will;(ii) the testator's actions in executing or directing the execution of the testator's electronic will; and(iii) the actions of every other witness in signing 20260SB1138PN1375 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the will.The term includes the use of technology or learned skills for the purpose of assisting with hearing, eyesight or speech or for the purpose of compensating for a hearing, eyesight or speech impairment."Record." Information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form."Sign." With present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:(1) to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or(2) to attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol or process."State." A state or commonwealth of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes a federally recognized Indian tribe.§ 2603. Law applicable to electronic will; principles of equity.An electronic will is a will for all purposes of the law of this Commonwealth. The law of this Commonwealth applicable to wills and principles of equity apply to an electronic will, except as modified by this chapter.§ 2604. Choice of law regarding execution.A will executed electronically but not in compliance with section 2605(a) (relating to execution of electronic will) is an electronic will under this chapter if executed in compliance with the law of the jurisdiction where the testator is domiciled at the time of the execution of the will or at the time of the 20260SB1138PN1375 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 testator's death.§ 2605. Execution of electronic will.(a) Requirements.--Subject to section 2607(e) (relating to electronic will attested and made self-proving at time of execution), an electronic will must be:(1) a record that is readable as text at the time of signing under paragraph (2);(2) signed:(i) by the testator; or(ii) if the testator is unable to sign the testator's name for any reason, by another individual in the testator's name, in the testator's physical presence and by the testator's express direction; and(3) signed in the presence of the testator by at least two individuals, each of whom is a resident of a state and physically located in a state at the time of signing.(b) Compilation of signatures in single record.--The signatures in subsection (a)(2) and (3) shall be compiled in the single record created in subsection (a)(1) at either the time of the execution of the electronic will or within a reasonable period of time following the execution of the electronic will.(c) Extrinsic evidence of intent.--Intent of a testator that the record under subsection (a)(1) is the testator's electronic will may be established by extrinsic evidence.§ 2606. Electronic revocation.(a) Electronic means.--A will may be revoked or altered by electronic means as follows:(1) Electronic will.--An electronic will may revoke all or part of a previous will.(2) Other electronic writing.--A will may be revoked by 20260SB1138PN1375 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 some other electronic writing declaring the same, executed and proved in the manner required of electronic wills.(b) Physical act.--An electronic will may be revoked by a physical act if the testator, with the intent and for the purpose of revoking all or part of the will, performed the act or expressly directed another individual who performed the act in the testator's presence. If the act is done by an individual other than the testator, the direction of the testator must be proved by the oaths or affirmation of two competent witnesses.§ 2607. Electronic will attested and made self-proving at time of execution.(a) Acknowledgment and affidavits.--An electronic will may be simultaneously executed, attested and made self-proving by acknowledgment of the testator and affidavits of the witnesses.(b) Requirements.--The acknowledgment and affidavits under subsection (a) must be:(1) made before:(i) an officer authorized to administer oaths under 57 Pa.C.S. Ch. 3 (relating to revised uniform law on notarial acts) and in compliance with that chapter;(ii) an officer authorized to administer oaths in another state in which execution occurs in compliance with the provisions of the laws of that state; or(iii) an attorney at law and certified to an officer as provided in subsection (d); and(2) evidenced by the officer's certificate, under official seal, affixed to or logically associated with the electronic will.(c) Required form.--The acknowledgment and affidavits under subsection (b) shall in form and content be substantially as set 20260SB1138PN1375 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 forth as follows:AcknowledgmentCommonwealth of Pennsylvania (or State of )County of I, , the testator whose name is signed to the attached or foregoing electronic will, having been duly qualified according to law, do hereby acknowledge that I signed and executed the instrument as my Last Will; and that I signed it willingly and as my free and voluntary act for the purposes therein expressed.Sworn to or affirmed and acknowledged before me by , the testator, by means of ( ) physical presence or ( ) communication technology, this day of , 20 . (Testator) (Signature of officer or attorney)(Seal and official capacity of officer or state of admission of attorney)AffidavitCommonwealth of Pennsylvania (or State of )County of We, and , the witnesses, whose names are signed to the attached or foregoing electronic will, being duly qualified according to law, do depose and say that we were in the presence of and observed the testator sign and execute the instrument as the testator's Last Will; that the testator signed willingly and executed it as the testator's free and voluntary act for the purposes therein expressed; that each subscribing witness, in the presence of the testator, signed the 20260SB1138PN1375 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electronic will as a witness; and that to the best of our knowledge the testator was at that time 18 or more years of age, of sound mind and under no constraint or undue influence.Sworn to or affirmed and acknowledged before me by by means of ( ) physical presence or ( ) communication technology, and by means of ( ) physical presence or ( ) communication technology, the witnesses, this day of , 20 . Witness Witness (Signature of officer or attorney)(Seal and official capacity of officer or state of admission of attorney)(d) Certification.--The acknowledgment of the testator and the affidavit of a witness required by subsection (b) may be made before a member of the bar of the Supreme Court of Pennsylvania or of the highest court of the state in which execution of the will occurs who certifies to:(1) an officer authorized to administer oaths under 57 Pa.C.S. Ch. 3 in compliance with that chapter; or(2) an officer authorized to administer oaths in another state in which the member of the bar is located in compliance with the provisions of the laws of the state, that the acknowledgment and affidavit was made before the attorney. In such case, in addition to the acknowledgment and affidavit required by subsection (b), the attorney's certification shall be evidenced by the officer before whom it was made 20260SB1138PN1375 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 substantially as follows:Attorney Acknowledgment and AffidavitCommonwealth of Pennsylvania (or State of )County of On this, the day of , 20 , before me (the undersigned officer), appeared (Attorney Bar ID Number: ), by means of ( ) physical presence or ( ) communication technology, known to me or satisfactorily proven to be a member of the bar of the highest court of (Pennsylvania or the state in which execution of the will took place), and certified that they were in the presence of the testator and the witnesses when the foregoing acknowledgment and affidavit were signed by the testator and witnesses.In witness whereof, I hereunto set my hand and official seal. (Signature, seal and official capacity of officer)(e) Physical or electronic attachment of signature.--A signature physically or electronically attached or annexed to an affidavit that is affixed to or logically associated with an electronic will under this chapter is deemed a signature of the electronic will under section 2605(a) (relating to execution of electronic will).§ 2608. Certification of paper copy.An individual may create a certified paper copy of an electronic will by affirming under penalty of perjury that to the best of the individual's knowledge, a paper copy of the electronic will is a complete, true and accurate copy of the electronic will. If the electronic will is made self-proving, the certified paper copy of the electronic will must include the 20260SB1138PN1375 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 self-proving affidavits.§ 2609. Transitional provision.This chapter applies to the electronic will of a decedent who dies on or after the effective date of this section.Section 4. Section 3132.1(a) of Title 20 is amended to read:§ 3132.1. Self-proved wills.(a) Proof.--Unless there is a contest with respect to the validity of the will, or unless the will is signed by mark or by another as provided in section 2502 (relating to form and execution of a will) or 2605 (relating to execution of electronic will), an affidavit of witness made in conformity with this section shall be accepted by the register as proof of the facts stated as if it had been made under oath before the register at the time of probate.* * *Section 5. Title 20 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 40UNIFORM ELECTRONIC ESTATE PLANNING DOCUMENTSSubchapterA. General Provisions and DefinitionsC. Electronic Non-Testamentary Estate Planning DocumentsE. Miscellaneous ProvisionsSUBCHAPTER AGENERAL PROVISIONS AND DEFINITIONSSec.4001. Short title of chapter.4002. Definitions.4003. Construction.§ 4001. Short title of chapter.This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Electronic Estate 20260SB1138PN1375 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Planning Documents Act.§ 4002. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Electronic." Relating to technology, having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities."Electronic record." A record created, generated, sent, communicated, received or stored by electronic means."Electronic signature." An electronic symbol or process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record."Information." Includes data, text, images, codes, computer programs, software and databases."Non-testamentary estate planning document." A record relating to estate planning that is readable as text at the time of signing and is not a will, codicil or testamentary trust. The term:(1) includes a record readable as text at the time of signing that creates, exercises, modifies, releases, revokes or terminates:(i) a trust under a trust instrument;(ii) a trust power that under the terms of the trust requires a signed record;(iii) an agreement under section 7710.1 (relating to nonjudicial settlement agreements - UTC 111) or 7740.1(a) (relating to modification or termination of noncharitable irrevocable trust by consent - UTC 411);(iv) a certification of trust under section 7790.3 20260SB1138PN1375 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to certification of trust - UTC 1013);(v) a power of attorney under Chapter 56 (relating to powers of attorney);(vi) an acknowledgment of agent under section 5601(d) (relating to general provisions);(vii) an affidavit of proof of continuance of powers of attorney under section 5606 (relating to proof of continuance of powers of attorney by affidavit);(viii) a certification of counsel under section 5608.1 (relating to liability for refusal to accept power of attorney);(ix) an advance health care directive, including a health care power of attorney or living will under Chapter 54 (relating to health care), mental health care power of attorney under Chapter 58 (relating to mental health care), directive to physicians, natural death statement and medical or physician order for life-sustaining treatment;(x) a record directing disposition of an individual's body after death;(xi) a nomination of a guardian for the signing individual;(xii) a nomination of a guardian for a minor child or disabled adult child;(xiii) an election under Chapter 22 (relating to elective share of surviving spouse);(xiv) a disclaimer under Chapter 62 (relating to disclaimers);(xv) any other record intended to carry out an individual's intent regarding property or health care 20260SB1138PN1375 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 while incapacitated or on death, except as otherwise prohibited by contract or applicable law; or(xvi) any other record relating to estate planning, estate administration or trust administration under this title, except as otherwise prohibited by contract or applicable law; and(2) does not include a deed of real property or certificate of title for a motor vehicle, watercraft or aircraft."Person." An individual, estate, trust, business or nonprofit entity, government or governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality or other legal entity."Record." Information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form."Security procedure." A procedure employed for the purpose of verifying that an electronic signature, record or performance is that of a specific person or for detecting changes or errors in an electronic record. The term includes a procedure which requires the use of algorithms or other codes, identifying word or number, encryption or callback or other acknowledgment procedure."Settlor." A person, other than a testator, that creates a trust."Sign." With present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:(1) execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or(2) attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol or process."State." A state or commonwealth of the United States, the 20260SB1138PN1375 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands or other territory or possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes a federally recognized Indian tribe."Terms of the trust." Either of the following:(1) the manifestation of the settlor's intent regarding a trust's provisions as:(i) expressed in the trust instrument; or(ii) established by other evidence that would be admissible in a judicial proceeding; or(2) the trust's provisions as established, determined or amended by:(i) a trustee or other person in accordance with applicable law;(ii) a court order; or(iii) an agreement under section 7710.1 or 7740.1(a)."Trust instrument." An instrument other than a will or codicil executed by the settlor that contains terms of the trust, including any amendments thereto."Will." An instrument executed pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 25 (relating to wills) or 26 (relating to electronic wills).§ 4003. Construction.This chapter must be construed and applied to:(1) facilitate electronic non-testamentary estate planning documents and signatures consistent with other applicable law; and(2) be consistent with reasonable practices concerning electronic documents and signatures and continued expansion 20260SB1138PN1375 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of those practices.SUBCHAPTER CELECTRONIC NON-TESTAMENTARY ESTATE PLANNING DOCUMENTSSec.4021. Scope of chapter.4022. Principles of law and equity.4023. Use of electronic record or signature not required.4024. Recognition of electronic non-testamentary estate planning document and electronic signature.4025. Attribution and effect of electronic record and electronic signature.4026. Notarization and acknowledgment.4027. Witnessing and attestation.4028. Retention of electronic records; original.4029. Certification of paper copy.4029.1. Admissibility in evidence.§ 4021. Scope of chapter.(a) Applicability.--Except as provided in subsection (b), this chapter applies to an electronic non-testamentary estate planning document and an electronic signature on a non-testamentary estate planning document.(b) Exception.--This chapter does not apply to a non-testamentary estate planning document if the document prohibits the use of an electronic record or electronic signature.(c) Validity of other law.--This chapter does not affect the validity of an electronic record or electronic signature that is valid under:(1) the act of December 16, 1999 (P.L.971, No.69), known as the Electronic Transactions Act;(2) Chapter 26 (relating to electronic wills); or20260SB1138PN1375 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) any other law of this Commonwealth relating to non-testamentary estate planning documents.§ 4022. Principles of law and equity.The law of this Commonwealth and principles of equity applicable to a non-testamentary estate planning document apply to an electronic non-testamentary estate planning document except as modified by this chapter.§ 4023. Use of electronic record or signature not required.(a) General rule.--This chapter does not require a non-testamentary estate planning document or signature on a non-testamentary estate planning document to be created, generated, sent, communicated, received, stored or otherwise processed or used by electronic means or in electronic form.(b) Previous document.--A person is not required to have a non-testamentary estate planning document in electronic form or signed electronically even if the person previously created or signed a non-testamentary estate planning document by electronic means.(c) Waiver prohibited.--A person may not waive the provisions of this section.§ 4024. Recognition of electronic non-testamentary estate planning document and electronic signature.(a) General rule.--A non-testamentary estate planning document or a signature on a non-testamentary estate planning document may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because it is in electronic form.(b) Other law requiring writing.--If other law of this Commonwealth requires a non-testamentary estate planning document to be in writing, an electronic record of the document satisfies the requirement.20260SB1138PN1375 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Other law requiring signature.--If other law of this Commonwealth requires a signature on a non-testamentary estate planning document, an electronic signature satisfies the requirement.§ 4025. Attribution and effect of electronic record and electronic signature.(a) General rule.--An electronic non-testamentary estate planning document or electronic signature on an electronic non-testamentary estate planning document is attributable to a person if it was the act of the person. The act of the person may be shown in any manner, including by showing the efficacy of a security procedure applied to determine the person to which the electronic record or electronic signature was attributable.(b) Determined by context and surrounding circumstances.--The effect of an electronic non-testamentary estate planning document or electronic signature attributed to a person under subsection (a) is determined from the context and surrounding circumstances at the time of its creation, execution or adoption, including the parties' agreement, if any, and as provided by other law.§ 4026. Notarization and acknowledgment.If other law of this Commonwealth requires a signature or record to be notarized, acknowledged, verified or made under oath, the requirement is satisfied with respect to an electronic non-testamentary estate planning document if an individual authorized to perform the notarization, acknowledgment, verification or oath attaches or logically associates the individual's electronic signature on the non-testamentary estate planning document together with all other information required to be included under the other law.20260SB1138PN1375 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 4027. Witnessing and attestation.(a) Other individuals generally.--If other law of this Commonwealth bases the validity of a non-testamentary estate planning document on whether it is signed, witnessed or attested by another individual, the signature, witnessing or attestation of that individual may be electronic.(b) Other individuals as witnesses.--Except as provided in subsection (c), if other law of this Commonwealth bases the validity of a non-testamentary estate planning document on whether it is signed, witnessed or attested by another individual in the presence of the person signing the non-testamentary estate planning document, "presence" shall have the meaning stated in subsection (d).(c) Other circumstances.--If other law of this Commonwealth permits a non-testamentary estate planning document to be signed by another individual on behalf of and at the direction of the maker of such document, then such other individual must sign in the physical presence of the maker of such document.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Maker." The settlor, principal or similar individual whose signature would otherwise be required to create a non-testamentary estate planning document."Observe" or "observing." To perceive another's actions or expressions of intent through the senses of eyesight and hearing. The term includes perceptions involving the use of technology or learned skills to:(1) assist the person's capabilities of eyesight or hearing, or both; or20260SB1138PN1375 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) compensate for an impairment of the person's capabilities of eyesight or hearing, or both."Presence" or "in the presence of." The term means:(1) the person signing the non-testamentary estate planning document and the witness or witnesses:(i) are directly located in the same physical space; or(ii) are able to interact with each other in real time through the use of audiovisual technology now known or later developed;(2) the witness or witnesses are able to positively identify the person signing the non-testamentary estate planning document; and(3) each witness is able to interact with the person signing the non-testamentary estate planning document and with each other by observing:(i) the expression of intent of the person signing the non-testamentary estate planning document to execute the non-testamentary estate planning document;(ii) the actions of the person signing the non-testamentary estate planning document in executing or directing the execution of such non-testamentary estate planning document; and(iii) the actions of every other witness in signing the non-testamentary estate planning document.The term includes the use of technology or learned skills for the purpose of assisting with hearing, eyesight or speech or for the purpose of compensating for a hearing, eyesight or speech impairment.§ 4028. Retention of electronic records; original.20260SB1138PN1375 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Requirement.--Subject to subsection (b), if a law requires a record subject to this chapter to be retained, transmitted, copied or filed, the requirement is satisfied by retaining, transmitting, copying or filing an electronic record that:(1) accurately reflects the information in the record after it was first generated in final form as an electronic record or under section 4029 (relating to certification of paper copy); and(2) remains accessible to the extent required by the other law.(b) Transaction information.--A requirement under subsection (a) to retain a record does not apply to information the sole purpose of which is to enable the record to be sent, communicated or received.(c) Agents.--A person may satisfy subsection (a) by using the services of another person.(d) Originals.--If other law of this state requires a record subject to this chapter to be presented or retained in its original form, or provides consequences if such record is not presented or retained in its original form, an electronic record retained in accordance with subsection (a) satisfies the other law.(e) Government agencies.--This section does not preclude a governmental agency from specifying requirements for the retention of a record subject to the agency's jurisdiction in addition to those in this section.(f) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "governmental agency" means an executive, legislative or judicial agency, department, board, commission, authority, 20260SB1138PN1375 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 institution or instrumentality of the Federal Government or of a state or of a county, municipality or other political subdivision of a state.§ 4029. Certification of paper copy.An individual may create a certified paper copy of an electronic non-testamentary estate planning document by affirming under penalty of perjury that to the best of the individual's knowledge, the paper copy is a complete, true and accurate copy of the document.§ 4029.1. Admissibility in evidence.Evidence relating to an electronic non-testamentary estate planning document or an electronic signature on the document may not be excluded in a proceeding solely because it is in electronic form.SUBCHAPTER EMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec.4031. Uniformity of application and construction.4032. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.4033. Transitional provision.§ 4031. Uniformity of application and construction.In applying and construing this chapter, a court shall consider the promotion of uniformity of the law among jurisdictions that enact it.§ 4032. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.This chapter modifies, limits or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (Public Law 106-229, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit or 20260SB1138PN1375 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 supersede section 101(c) of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c)), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b)).§ 4033. Transitional provision.This chapter applies to an electronic non-testamentary estate planning document created, signed, generated, sent, communicated, received or stored on or after the effective date of this section.Section 6. Sections 5442(b), 5452(b), 5822(b) and 6201 of Title 20 are amended to read:§ 5442. Execution.* * *(b) Requirements.--A living will [shall] must be:(1) dated [and];(1.1) signed by the principal by signature or mark or by another individual on behalf of and at the direction of the principal if the principal is unable to sign but specifically directs another individual to sign the living will; and(2) witnessed by two individuals, each of whom is 18 years of age or older.* * *§ 5452. Execution.* * *(b) Requirements.--A health care power of attorney must be:(1) dated [and];(1.1) signed by the principal by signature or mark or by another individual on behalf of and at the direction of the principal if the principal is unable to sign but specifically 20260SB1138PN1375 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 directs another individual to sign the health care power of attorney; and(2) witnessed by two individuals, each of whom is 18 years of age or older.* * *§ 5822. Execution.* * *(b) Requirements.--A declaration must be:(1) Dated [and signed].(1.1) Signed by the declarant by signature or mark or by another individual on behalf of and at the direction of the declarant.(2) Witnessed by two individuals, each of whom must be at least 18 years of age.* * *§ 6201. Right to disclaim.(a) Authorization.--A person to whom an interest in property would have devolved by whatever means, including a beneficiary under a will, an appointee under the exercise of a power of appointment, a person entitled to take by intestacy, a joint tenant with right of survivorship, a donee of an inter vivos transfer, a donee under a third-party beneficiary contract (including beneficiaries of life insurance and annuity policies and pension, profit-sharing and other employee benefit plans), and a person entitled to a disclaimed interest, may disclaim it in whole or in part by a written disclaimer which [shall] must:(1) describe the interest disclaimed;(2) declare the disclaimer and extent thereof; [and](3) be signed by the disclaimant[.]; and(4) if the disclaimer is signed by the disclaimant under 20260SB1138PN1375 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 4024(c) (relating to recognition of electronic non-testamentary estate planning document and electronic signature), be witnessed by two individuals, each of whom must be at least 18 years of age.(b) No restrictions.--The right to disclaim shall exist notwithstanding any limitation on the interest in the nature of a spendthrift provision or similar restriction.Section 7. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1138PN1375 - 25 - 12345678